North Carolina, session 2025, HB464.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-47 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(70) To Provide at Least One School Nurse in Every School. – Local boards of
education shall ensure that each school within the local school administrative
unit is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C is amended by adding a new subdivision to
read:
"(37) To provide at least one school nurse in every school. – The board of trustees
shall ensure that each school is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent
school nurse."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) At Least One School Nurse. – A charter school shall ensure that the school is staffed
by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) At least one school nurse required. – A regional school shall ensure that the
school is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) At least one school nurse required. – A laboratory school shall ensure that the
school is staffed by at least one full-time, permanent school nurse."
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction for the 2025-2026 fiscal year the sum of ninety-five million dollars
($95,000,000) in recurring funds to increase the School Health Personnel Allotment. These funds
shall be used to increase positions for school nurses in order to provide at least one full-time,
permanent school nurse in every school in a public school unit.
*H464-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 3. Funds provided pursuant to this act shall supplement and not supplant
any funds from any source already provided for school nurses.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025. Section 1 of this act applies
beginning with the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 House Bill 464-First Edition